Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 11 Abused and Neglected Children

40-11-1.
Policy.

The public policy of this state is: to protect children whose health and welfare may be adversely affected through injury and neglect; to strengthen the family and to make the home safe for children by enhancing the parental capacity for good child care; to provide a temporary or permanent nurturing and safe environment for children when necessary; and, for these purposes, to require the mandatory reporting of known or suspected child abuse and neglect, investigation of those reports by a social agency, and provision of services, where needed, to the child and family.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2.

40-11-2.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter and unless the specific context indicates otherwise:

“Abused or neglected child” means a child whose physical or mental health or welfare is harmed, or threatened with harm, when his or her parent or other person responsible for his or her welfare:

Inflicts, or allows to be inflicted, upon the child physical or mental injury, including excessive corporal punishment; or

Creates, or allows to be created, a substantial risk of physical or mental injury to the child, including excessive corporal punishment; or

Commits, or allows to be committed, against the child an act of sexual abuse; or

Fails to supply the child with adequate food, clothing, shelter, or medical care, though financially able to do so or offered financial or other reasonable means to do so; or

Fails to provide the child with a minimum degree of care or proper supervision or guardianship because of his or her unwillingness or inability to do so by situations or conditions such as, but not limited to: social problems, mental incompetency, or the use of a drug, drugs, or alcohol to the extent that the parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare loses his or her ability or is unwilling to properly care for the child; or

Abandons or deserts the child; or

Sexually exploits the child in that the person allows, permits, or encourages the child to engage in prostitution as defined by the provisions in §

11-34.1-1

et seq., entitled “Commercial Sexual Activity”; or

Sexually exploits the child in that the person allows, permits, encourages, or engages in the obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or depiction of the child in a setting that, taken as a whole, suggests to the average person that the child is about to engage in, or has engaged in, any sexual act, or that depicts any such child under eighteen (18) years of age performing sodomy, oral copulation, sexual intercourse, masturbation, or bestiality; or

Commits, or allows to be committed, any sexual offense against the child as sexual offenses are defined by the provisions of chapter 37 of title 11, entitled “Sexual Assault,” as amended; or

Commits, or allows to be committed, against any child an act involving sexual penetration or sexual contact if the child is under fifteen (15) years of age; or if the child is fifteen (15) years or older, and (1) Force or coercion is used by the perpetrator, or (2) The perpetrator knows, or has reason to know, that the victim is a severely impaired person as defined by the provisions of §

11-5-11

, or physically helpless as defined by the provisions of §

11-37-1(6)

.

“Child” means a person under the age of eighteen (18).

“Child protective investigator” means an employee of the department charged with responsibility for investigating complaints and referrals of child abuse and neglect and institutional child abuse and neglect.

“Children’s advocacy center (CAC)” means a community-based organization that is a member of the Rhode Island chapter of children advocacy centers and an accredited member (or working toward accreditation) of the National Children’s Alliance.

“Department” means department of children, youth and families.

“Educational program” means any public or private school, including boarding schools, or any home-schooling program.

“Healthcare provider” means any provider of healthcare services involved in the delivery or care of infants or care of children.

“Institution” means any private or public hospital or other facility providing medical or psychiatric diagnosis, treatment, and care.

“Institutional child abuse and neglect” means situations of known or suspected child abuse or neglect where the person allegedly responsible for the abuse or neglect is a foster parent or the employee of a public or private residential childcare institution or agency; or any staff person providing out-of-home care or situations where the suspected abuse or neglect occurs as a result of the institution’s practices, policies, or conditions.

“Law enforcement agency” means the police department in any city or town or the state police.

“Mental injury” includes a state of substantially diminished psychological or intellectual functioning in relation to, but not limited to, such factors as: failure to thrive; ability to think or reason; control of aggressive or self-destructive impulses; acting-out or misbehavior, including incorrigibility, ungovernability, or habitual truancy; provided, however, that the injury must be clearly attributable to the unwillingness or inability of the parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare to exercise a minimum degree of care toward the child.

“Person responsible for child’s welfare” means the child’s parent; guardian; any individual, eighteen (18) years of age or older, who resides in the home of a parent or guardian and has unsupervised access to a child; foster parent; an employee of a public or private residential home or facility; or any staff person providing out-of-home care (out-of-home care means child day care to include family day care, group day care, and center-based day care). Provided, further, that an individual, eighteen (18) years of age or older, who resides in the home of a parent or guardian and has unsupervised access to the child, shall not have the right to consent to the removal and examination of the child for the purposes of §

40-11-6

.

“Physician” means any licensed doctor of medicine, licensed osteopathic physician, and any physician, intern, or resident of an institution as defined in subsection (8).

“Probable cause” means facts and circumstances based upon as accurate and reliable information as possible that would justify a reasonable person to suspect that a child is abused or neglected. The facts and circumstances may include evidence of an injury, or injuries, and the statements of a person worthy of belief, even if there is no present evidence of injury.

“Shaken-baby syndrome” means a form of abusive head trauma, characterized by a constellation of symptoms caused by other than accidental traumatic injury resulting from the violent shaking of or impact upon an infant or young child’s head.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 248, § 9; P.L. 1981, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 131; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 101; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 101; P.L. 2000, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 547, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 20; P.L. 2016, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 262, § 1.

40-11-3.
Duty to report — Deprivation of nutrition or medical treatment.

Any person who has reasonable cause to know or suspect that any child has been abused or neglected as defined in §

40-11-2

, or has been a victim of sexual abuse by another child, shall, within twenty-four (24) hours, transfer that information to the department of children, youth and families, or its agent, which shall cause the report to be investigated immediately. As a result of those reports and referrals, protective social services shall be made available to those children in an effort to safeguard and enhance the welfare of those children and to provide a means to prevent further abuse or neglect. The department shall establish and implement a single, statewide, toll-free telephone to operate twenty-four (24) hours per day, seven (7) days per week for the receipt of reports concerning child abuse and neglect, which reports shall be electronically recorded and placed in the central registry established by §

42-72-7

. The department shall create a sign, using a format that is clear, simple, and understandable to students, that contains the statewide, toll-free telephone number for posting in all public and private schools in languages predominately spoken in the state, containing pertinent information relating to reporting the suspicion of child abuse, neglect, and sexual abuse. This sign shall be available to the school districts electronically. The electronically recorded records, properly indexed by date and other essential, identifying data, shall be maintained for a minimum of three (3) years; provided, however, any person who has been reported for child abuse and/or neglect, and who has been determined not to have neglected and/or abused a child, shall have his or her record expunged as to that incident three (3) years after that determination. The department shall continuously maintain a management-information database that includes all of the information required to implement this section, including the number of cases reported by hospitals, healthcare centers, emergency rooms, and other appropriate healthcare facilities.

The reporting shall include immediate notification of the department of any instance where parents of an infant have requested deprivation of nutrition that is necessary to sustain life and/or who have requested deprivation of medical or surgical intervention that is necessary to remedy or ameliorate a life-threatening medical condition, if the nutrition or medical or surgical intervention is generally provided to similar nutritional, medical, or surgical conditioned infants, whether disabled or not.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prevent a child’s parents and physician from discontinuing the use of life-support systems or nonpalliative treatment for a child who is terminally ill where, in the opinion of the child’s physician exercising competent medical judgment, the child has no reasonable chance of recovery from the terminal illness despite every, appropriate medical treatment to correct the condition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 248, § 9; P.L. 1983, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 655, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 101; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 101; P.L. 2013, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 63, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 465, § 2.

40-11-3.1.
Duty to report death of child due to child abuse or neglect.

Any person required to report under the provisions of this title, who has reasonable cause to know or suspect that a child has died as a result of child abuse or neglect shall immediately transfer that information to the department or its agent who shall cause the report to be investigated immediately. Upon receipt of the report, the department or its agent shall immediately transfer the information to the local law enforcement agency or the state police as well as to the office of the medical examiner. The office of the medical examiner shall investigate the report and communicate its preliminary findings, orally within seventy-two (72) hours, and in writing within seven (7) working days to the appropriate law enforcement agency, to the department and, if the person who made the report is an employee or a member of the staff of a hospital, to the hospital. The office of the medical examiner shall also communicate its final findings and conclusions, with the basis therefore, to the same parties within sixty (60) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 257, § 2.

40-11-3.2.
False reporting of child abuse and neglect.

Any person who knowingly and willfully makes, or causes to be made, to the department a false report of child abuse or neglect shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 156, § 1.

40-11-3.3.
Duty to report — Sexual abuse of a child in an educational program.

Any person who has reasonable cause to know or suspect that any child has been the victim of sexual abuse by an employee, agent, contractor, or volunteer of an educational program as defined in §

40-11-2

shall, within twenty-four (24) hours, transfer that information to the department of children, youth and families, or its agent; provided, however, that if the person mandated to report is an employee, agent, contractor, or volunteer of an educational program as defined in §

40-11-2

, they shall immediately notify the principal, headmaster, executive director, or other person in charge of the educational program, or his or her designated agent. The principal, headmaster, executive director, or other person in charge of the educational program, or his or her designated agent, shall be responsible for all subsequent notification to the department of children, youth and families, or its agent in the manner required by this section. In the case of a public educational program, the principal, headmaster, executive director, or other person in charge of the educational program, or his or her designated agent, shall also notify the superintendent of the public educational program. Any transferred information shall include the name, title, and contact information for every employee, agent, contractor, or volunteer of the educational program who is believed to have direct knowledge of the allegation. Nothing in this section is intended to require more than one report from any educational program for a specific incident.

In order to provide guidance and consistency in reporting, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate policies and procedures for the creation and handling of reports made by the principal, headmaster, executive director, or other person in charge of the educational program, or his or her designated agent in order to carry out the intent of this section.

The department of children, youth and families, or its agent shall immediately forward the report to state police and local law enforcement, and shall initiate an investigation of the allegations of sexual abuse if it determines that the report meets the criteria for a child protective services investigation. As a result of those reports and referrals, the department shall refer those children to appropriate services and support systems in order to provide for their health and welfare. In the event the department substantiates the allegations of sexual abuse against an employee, agent, contractor, or volunteer of an educational program, the department shall immediately notify the state police; the local law enforcement agency; the department of education; the educational program; the person who is the subject of the investigation; and the parent, or parents, of the child who is alleged to be the victim of the sexual abuse of the department’s findings.

The director of the department of children, youth and families is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to the investigation of the allegation of sexual abuse in order to carry out the intent of this section.

For purposes of this section, “reasonable cause to know or suspect” means that it is objectively reasonable for a person to entertain a suspicion, based upon facts that could cause a reasonable person in a like position, drawing, when appropriate, on the person’s training and experience, to suspect child abuse. “Reasonable cause to know or suspect” does not require certainty that child sexual abuse has occurred nor does it require a specific medical indication of child sexual abuse; any “reasonable cause to know or suspect” is sufficient.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 352, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 373, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 240, § 1.

40-11-4.
Immunity from liability.

Any person participating in good faith in making a report pursuant to this chapter shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2.

40-11-5.
Protective custody by physician or law enforcement officer.

Any physician or duly certified registered nurse practitioner treating a child who has suffered physical injury that appears to have been caused by other than accidental means, or a child suffering from malnutrition or sexual molestation, shall have the right to keep the child in the custody of a hospital or any licensed childcare center or facility for no longer than seventy-two (72) hours, with or without the consent of the child’s parents or guardian, pending the filing of an ex-parte petition to the family court. The expense for that temporary care shall be paid by the parents or legal guardian of the child or, if they are unable to pay, by the department.

Any police or law enforcement officer may take a child into protective custody without the consent of the parents, or others exercising control over the child.

If the officer has reasonable cause to believe that there exists an imminent danger to the child’s life or health unless he or she is taken into protective custody, the officer shall immediately notify and place the child with the director of the department of children, youth and families, or his or her designated agent, who shall care for the child; provided, however, that no child may be detained in protective custody longer than forty-eight (48) hours without the express approval of a justice of the family court.

Any child protective investigator or social caseworker II employed by the department, may take a child into temporary protective custody without the consent of his or her parent or other person responsible for the welfare of the child, if the investigator or social caseworker II has reasonable cause to believe that the child or his or her sibling has been abused and/or neglected and that continued care of the child by his or her parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare will result in imminent further harm to the child. The investigator or social caseworker II shall have the child examined by a licensed physician or duly certified registered nurse practitioner within twenty-four (24) hours in accordance with the provisions of §

40-11-6(c)

; and, provide further, that the child shall not be detained in protective custody longer than forty-eight (48) hours without the expressed approval of a justice of the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 82, § 1.

40-11-6.
Report by physicians and healthcare providers of abuse or neglect.

When any physician, duly certified registered nurse practitioner, or other healthcare provider is involved in the delivery or care of infants born with, or identified as being affected by, substance abuse or withdrawal symptoms resulting from prenatal drug exposure or a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder, or has cause to suspect that a child brought to him or her, or coming to him or her, for examination, care, or treatment, is an abused or neglected child as defined in this chapter, or when he or she determines that a child under the age of twelve (12) years is suffering from any sexually transmitted disease, he or she shall report the incident or cause a report thereof to be made to the department as provided in subsection (b).

An immediate oral report shall be made by telephone or otherwise, to both the department and law enforcement agency, and shall be followed by a report, in writing, to the department and law enforcement agency explaining the extent and nature of the abuse or neglect the child is alleged to have suffered.

The department, upon receipt of such a report by a person other than a physician or duly certified registered nurse practitioner alleging that a child has been physically abused, shall investigate the report, and if the investigation reveals evidence of injury or that the child has been the victim of sexual abuse, the department shall have the child examined by a licensed physician or duly certified registered nurse practitioner. Any child protective investigator shall, with or without the consent of the parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare, have the right to remove the child from the place where the child may be to secure the examination required by this subsection. Upon completion of the examination, it shall be mandatory for the physician or duly certified registered nurse practitioner to make a written report of his or her findings to the department.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 424, § 1.

40-11-6.1.
Penalty for failure to report or perform required act.

Any person, official, physician, or institution required by this chapter to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect or to perform any other act who knowingly fails to do so or who knowingly prevents any person acting reasonably from doing so shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than one year or both. In addition, any person, official, physician, or institution who knowingly fails to perform any act required by this chapter or who knowingly prevents another person from performing a required act shall be civilly liable for the damages proximately caused by that failure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 248, § 10.

40-11-7.
Investigation of reports — Petition for removal from custody — Report to child advocate — Attorney general — Court-appointed special advocate — Children’s advocacy center.

The department shall investigate reports of child abuse and neglect made under this chapter in accordance with the rules the department has promulgated and in order to determine the circumstances surrounding the alleged abuse or neglect and the cause thereof. The investigation shall include personal contact with the child named in the report and any other children in the same household. Any person required to investigate reports of child abuse and/or neglect may question the subjects of those reports with or without the consent of the parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare. The interviewing of the child or children, if they are of the mental capacity to be interviewed, shall take place in the absence of the person or persons responsible for the alleged neglect or abuse. In the event that any person required to investigate child abuse and/or neglect is denied reasonable access to a child by the parents or other person, and that person required to investigate deems that the best interests of the child so require, they may request the intervention of a local law enforcement agency, or seek an appropriate court order to examine and interview the child. The department shall provide such social services and other services as are necessary to protect the child and preserve the family.

In the event that after investigation it is determined by the department that the child is being or has been abused or neglected but that the circumstances of the child’s family or otherwise do not require the removal of the child for his or her protection, the department may allow the child to remain at home and provide the family and child with access to preventative support and services. In addition, the department is authorized to petition the family court for an order for the provision of treatment of the family and child. Provided, further, the department shall notify the children’s advocacy center of all suspected cases of child sexual abuse.

The department shall have the duty to petition the family court for removal of the child from the care and custody of the parents, or any other person having custody or care of the child, if there is a determination that a child has been abused or neglected; which results in a child death, serious physical or emotional harm, sexual abuse or exploitation, or an act or failure to act that represents an imminent risk of serious harm. In addition, in cases of alleged abuse and/or neglect, the department may petition the family court for the removal of the alleged perpetrator of that abuse and/or neglect from the household of the child or children when the child or children are eleven (11) years of age or older. It shall be the responsibility of the department to make the parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare aware of the court action, the possible consequences of the court action, and to explain the rights of the parent relative to the court action.

The department shall forward immediately any reports of institutional child abuse and neglect to the child advocate who shall investigate the report in accordance with chapter 73 of title 42, and also to any guardian ad litem and/or attorney of record for the child.

In the event that after investigation the department takes any action regarding placement of the child, the department shall immediately notify the child advocate of such action.

In the event that after investigation the department has reasonable cause to know or suspect that a child has been subjected to criminal abuse or neglect, the department shall forward immediately any information as it relates to that knowledge or suspicion to the law enforcement agency.

If a report is accepted as a valid allegation of abuse or neglect, the department shall collect information concerning the military status of the parent or guardian of the child who is the subject of the report and shall share information about the allegation with the appropriate military authorities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 248, § 9; P.L. 1981, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 117, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 47, § 1, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 48, § 1, effective June 7, 2022.

40-11-7.1.
Family court proceedings.

The family court shall, upon the filing of an ex parte petition, hereunder, immediately take any action it deems necessary or appropriate for the protection of the child, or children, suspected of being abused or neglected, including the removal of the child, or children, from the custody of the parent, or parents, or other person suspected of the abuse or neglect.

A hearing on the petition shall be held within seven (7) days from the filing thereof, for the court to:

Advise the parent, or parents, or other person having care of the child, of the allegations contained in the petition;

Enter either a denial or admission of the allegations contained in the petition;

Ensure that a guardian ad litem and/or a court-appointed special advocate has been appointed to represent the child;

Appoint an attorney to represent the parent, or parents, or any other person having care of the child, alleged to have abused or neglected a child when the parent or custodian is unable to afford representation, as determined by the court;

Advise the parent, or parents, or any other person having care of the child, of his or her right to a probable cause hearing on the ex parte petition to be held as soon as practicable but no later than ten (10) days from the date of the request;

Make inquiry of the mother of the child to determine the identity of the biological father of the child, if necessary;

In the event that a person named as a putative father appears and denies that he is the biological father of the child, the court shall direct that any such putative father execute a written denial of paternity setting forth the implications of the denial in a form to be adopted by the family court in accordance with the provisions of this section. Execution of the document by the putative father shall constitute prima facie evidence of his denial of paternity. Upon execution of the denial of paternity form, the court shall find that the department has no duty to make reasonable efforts to strengthen and encourage the relationship between the child and that putative father and the lack of such efforts may not be cited for any purpose by the putative father in any future proceeding conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of chapter 7 of title 15 or chapter 8 of title 15;

Make any interim orders in its discretion respecting the rights of the child.

The family court, upon identification of an alleged biological father by the mother of the child, shall order service of the petition and notice of hearing date to be made upon him in accordance with the rules of juvenile proceedings.

If an alleged putative father appears at the hearing or appears at any subsequent hearing and denies paternity, the court shall direct that any such putative father execute a written denial of paternity setting forth the implications of the denial in a form to be adopted by the family court in accordance with the provisions of this section. Execution of the document by the putative father shall constitute prima facie evidence of his denial of paternity. Upon execution of the denial of paternity form, the court shall make a finding that the department has no duty to make reasonable efforts to strengthen and encourage the relationship between the child and that putative father and the lack of such efforts may not be cited for any purpose by the putative father in any future proceeding conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of chapter 7 of title 15 or the provisions of chapter 8 of title 15.

If an alleged putative father appears and neither admits nor denies paternity, the department of children, youth and families shall, within five (5) days, refer the putative father to the department of human services for a determination of paternity in accordance with chapter 8 of title 15.

If a putative father, having been duly served with notice, fails to appear, the court shall find that the department has no duty to make reasonable efforts to strengthen and encourage the relationship between the child and the putative father and the lack of such efforts may not be cited for any purpose in any future proceedings conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of chapter 7 of title 15 or the provisions of chapter 8 of title 15.

Execution of a written denial of paternity pursuant to this chapter shall have no legal effect on paternity or child support proceedings commenced under chapter 8 of title 15.

At the probable cause hearing, credible hearsay evidence may, in the discretion of the court, be admissible. The petitioner may submit a signed physician’s report that, while not conclusive, shall constitute prima facie evidence to support continued detention of the child pursuant to the ex parte order pending a trial on the merits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 248, § 10; P.L. 1981, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 98, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 45, § 1.

40-11-7.2.
Evidence.

A videotape recording made by the department of children, youth and families, a law enforcement officer, a hospital, or a children’s advocacy center of an interview of or statement made by a child who is the subject of an investigation conducted pursuant to §

40-11-7

is admissible in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter, notwithstanding any objection to hearsay statements contained therein, provided it is relevant and material and provided its probative value substantially outweighs the danger of unfair prejudice to the child’s parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child’s welfare. The circumstances of the making of the videotape recording, including the maker’s lack of personal knowledge, may be proved to affect its weight.

Prior to the videotaped recording being introduced into evidence the court shall first determine that:

The statement is sworn to under oath by the child and the significance of the oath is explained to the child;

The recording is both visual and aural and is recorded on film or videotaped or by other electronic means;

The recording equipment was capable of making an accurate recording, the operator of the equipment was competent, and the recording is accurate and has not been altered;

Every voice on the recording is identified;

The statement was not made in response to questioning calculated to lead the child to make a particular statement;

The person conducting the interview of the child is available to testify at any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter; and

The child shall be available to testify at any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 262, § 1.

40-11-7.3.
Mediation of child protection matters.

The family court may establish a voluntary mediation program for child protection matters. Once established, the court may, with the consent of the parties, refer to mediation all or any portion of a matter relating to child protection matters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 59, § 2.

40-11-8.
Injury control unit.

The department shall establish a statewide injury-control unit to make possible more intensive protective services to high-risk families with children, and close coordination with a variety of community groups, medical facilities, and medical groups to ensure early detection and reporting of known or suspected abuse to protect the physical and mental well-being of children.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2.

40-11-9.
Duties of law enforcement agency.

Upon the receipt of a report concerning the alleged abuse or neglect of a child, it shall be the duty of the law enforcement agency to investigate further and to report the results of the investigation to the department and/or family court; provided, however, if there is reasonable cause to believe that a crime has been committed, the law enforcement agency shall report the result of the investigation to the department of attorney general. The investigation shall include personal contact with the child named in the report and any other children in the same household. The interviewing of the child, or children, if they are of the mental capacity to be interviewed, shall take place in the absence of the person or persons responsible for the alleged neglect or abuse.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 129, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 80, § 1.

40-11-10.
Use of physician’s report for petition for removal.

In the case of an ex parte petition for removal under this chapter, a signed physician’s report that a child is abused or neglected as previously defined shall be sufficient to support approval of the ex parte petition for removal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 248, § 9.

40-11-11.
Abrogation of privileged communications.

The privileged quality of communication between husband and wife and any professional person and his or her patient or client, except that between attorney and client, is hereby abrogated in situations involving known or suspected child abuse or neglect and shall not constitute grounds for failure to report as required by this chapter; failure to cooperate with the department in its activities pursuant to this chapter; or failure to give or accept evidence in any judicial proceeding relating to child abuse or neglect. In any family court proceeding relating to child abuse or neglect, notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 37.3 of title 5, or the provisions of §

9-17-24

, no privilege of confidentiality may be invoked with respect to any illness, trauma, incompetency, addiction to drugs, or alcoholism of any parent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 106, § 1.

40-11-12.
Award of custody.

If the court shall find that a child is abused or neglected within the meaning of this chapter, the court shall by decree duly enter process as follows.

Place the child under the supervision of the department in his or her own home if the court makes a determination that the child will be safely maintained in the home, or award the care, custody, and control of the child to the department upon terms as the court shall determine. The court may place the custody of the child in the department until such time as it finds that the child may be returned to the parents, or other person previously having custody or care of the child, under circumstances consistent with the child’s safety.

The court may require the parent, or person previously having custody, to undertake a program of counseling, including psychiatric evaluation and/or treatment as a prerequisite to the return of the child to his or her custody.

When a child has been placed in the care, custody, and control of the department pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or of chapter 1 of title 14, the court shall have the power to appoint a guardian of the person of the child.

No petition for guardianship shall be granted unless it contains the written consent of the parent or parents previously having custody of the child and of the department of children, youth and families.

The entry of a decree of guardianship pursuant to this section shall terminate the award of custody to the department and the involvement of the department with the child and the child’s parents. The court may revoke a guardianship awarded pursuant to this section if the court finds, after a hearing on a motion for revocation, that continuation of the guardianship is not in the best interests of the child.

Notice of any hearing on such motion shall be provided by the moving party to the department of children, youth and families, the court-appointed special advocate, the parent or guardian, and any and all other interested parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 87, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 23.